Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 70 CONSERVATION DISTRICTS
35-70-120. Change of name.

The term "soil erosion district" as used in "The Colorado Soil Conservation Act of 1937" and "conservation district" as used in this article shall be deemed synonymous. Districts organized after April 3, 1941, shall be known as conservation districts, and districts organized before April 3, 1941, may be known either as soil erosion districts or as conservation districts, as determined by the supervisors of such districts. The change of name permitted by this section shall not affect in any way the rights or obligations of districts or landowners or impair the obligations of any contract to which any such district is a party at the time of such change of name.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 708, § 2.

CSA:

C. 149B, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-20.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 523, § 27, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

"The Colorado Soil Conservation Act", enacted in 1937, first appeared in the 1941 and 1942 supplements to the 1935 Colorado Statutes Annotated before being compiled into volume 4B, 1949 replacement volume, of the 1935 Colorado Statutes Annotated.

35-70-121. Cooperation between districts.

Whenever, by reason of location, similarity of problems, and need for mutual assistance, the purpose of this article may be more economically, completely, and satisfactorily performed and accomplished thereby, two or more conservation districts may cooperate with each other by the joint exercise of the powers granted in section 35-70-108. The nature and extent of such cooperation and the duties and obligations of and benefits to the respective cooperating districts and interests in property that may be jointly acquired and used shall be determined by contract to be entered into between or among the cooperating districts, subject to the bylaws adopted by each of such districts and to the direction of the qualified voters at any regular or regularly called special meeting of each such district.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 677, § 9.

CSA:

C. 149B, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 128-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 128-1-21.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 537, § 14, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 524, § 28, effective July 1.

35-70-122. Contributions for purposes of inclusion of conservation districts in the risk management fund.

Each conservation district shall contribute moneys, which shall be deposited in the risk management fund, for the conservation district's proportionate share, as determined by the executive director of the department of personnel, of potential claims arising from conservation districts.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 980, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1544, § 140, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 524, § 29, effective July 1.